Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.610

Police officers—Appointment without regard to residence authorized.

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 35.21.200, as now or hereafter amended, all cities of the first class shall have the right and authority to appoint and employ a person as a regular or special police officer of said city regardless of his or her place of residence or domicile at the date of his or her appointment.

This provision shall supersede any provision of any city charter to the contrary.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2047; 1967 ex.s. c 37 s 1.]

NOTES:

Residence requirements for appointive city officials and employees: RCW 35.21.200.